Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15.8 Water Use and Efficiency Act

46-15.8-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Water Use and Efficiency Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 3.

46-15.8-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Rhode Island is fortunate to have sufficient precipitation to meet Rhode Island’s water needs, if that water is not wasted and if it is well and fairly managed. With scarcity of water a growing concern for many southern and western states, Rhode Island’s adequate water supply can and should be an economic advantage for our state;

Water is a renewable but a limited resource essential to the survival of all living things. The mission of the water supply profession is to provide a reliable supply of high quality water for the protection of public health, safety and welfare, and to ensure a sustainable balance between human and ecological water needs. Environmental stewardship and integrated water resource management, including land conservation, wetlands protection, and protecting the ecological integrity of water resources, are core values of the water supply profession and are essential to sustaining this mission;

Efficient and equitable management of our shared water resources allows us to make water available to new economic development as well as meet existing water needs, both of which support our state’s economic vitality and the quality of life of our communities;

Good management allows us to provide water for necessary residential use as well as economic growth, at the same time that we preserve and protect the natural resources that make Rhode Island such an attractive place to live, and that support important economic activity that depends upon a healthy environment, such as fisheries, farming and tourism;

Rhode Island is currently consuming large amounts of water for inefficient outdoor non-agricultural summer landscape irrigation.

More efficient use of our shared water supply, especially by residential users, makes more water available for economic activity and for replenishment of stream flow, and is usually the most cost-effective and quickest way to maximize available water supply. Conservation must be a priority for successful water management.

Rhode Island’s water supply infrastructure must be maintained if it is to continue to supply the state with clean water sufficient to meet our needs; it is far cheaper to “pay as you go” than to defer infrastructure maintenance, which will result in it being far more expensive in the future.

Municipalities should consider the water available for human use and likely water needs at build out in making planning decisions.

The Rhode Island Water Resources Board, as an independent water supply agency, is vital to the success of this legislation and will provide necessary balance in working toward the sustainability of Rhode Island’s water resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 3.

46-15.8-3.
Purposes.

The purposes of this act are:

To help assure reasonable, needed and adequate future water supplies by:

Managing demand;

Reinvesting in water supply infrastructure and water supply resources; and

Protecting and preserving the health and ecological functioning of the water resources of the state.

To strengthen water resources and supply planning by implementing, effectively and efficiently, water rates and water supply system management plans that are designed to achieve appropriate infrastructure reinvestment and demand management.

To increase the efficient and effective administration of government responsibilities by establishing municipal water departments, boards, and authorities as self-sustaining enterprise funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 3.

46-15.8-4.
Duties of water suppliers.

All public drinking water supply systems that are subject to the requirements of §

46-15.3-5.1

shall have a duty:

To manage demand to assure the long-term viability of water resources and water supply, to provide for strategic, prudent, reasonable and necessary use of water supplies, to control and/or curtail water use during periods of diminished water supply availability including droughts; to take such actions as may be necessary to achieve compliance by wholesale and retail customers with requirements for demand management; and

To maintain fiscal integrity and adequate capacity by establishing and maintaining such revenue stabilization funds, operating reserves, debt service reserves, and infrastructure replacement and capital improvement program funds as are necessary; and to institute by December 31, 2013, billing at least as frequently as quarterly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 3.

46-15.8-5.
Duties of state agencies.

In order to accomplish the purposes of this chapter:

The water resources board shall establish and maintain no later than July 31, 2010, targets for non-agricultural demand management and water use, and for non-billed water which shall include the goal of reducing leakage to no more than ten percent (10%) of water supplies in public water supplies subject to the provisions of §

46-15.3-5.1

;

The statewide planning program shall incorporate, by July 1, 2011, such amendments as may be necessary into state guide plan elements to require:

The use of water availability estimates developed by the water resources board and the department of environmental management and other relevant information sources in local comprehensive plan elements and the review of major land development and subdivision reviews;

The incorporation of the executive summaries of the water supply system management plans, as appropriate, into the services and facilities element and the land use element of local comprehensive plans;

The public utilities commission shall assure, in accordance with provisions of chapter 15.1 of title 39, that the rates of water suppliers subject to its jurisdiction are adequate to implement capital improvement plans, water supply system management plans, and demand management plans and to cover system costs when revenues decline as a result of decreased demand.

State agencies need to become advocates for positive solutions by removing overlapping and burdensome planning and regulatory requirements.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 3.